District of Columbia statutes.
16-2328

Interlocutory appeals.

(a)

A child who has been ordered transferred for criminal prosecution under section 16-2307 or detained or placed in shelter care or subjected to conditions of release under section 16-2312, may, within two days of the date of entry of the Division’s order, file a notice of interlocutory appeal.

(b)

The District of Columbia Court of Appeals shall (1) hear argument on an appeal under subsection (a) on or before the third day (excluding Sundays) after the filing of notice under that subsection, (2) dispense with any requirement of written briefs other than the supporting materials previously submitted to the Division, and (3) render its decision on or before the next day following argument on appeal. The court may in rendering its decision dispense with the issuance of a written opinion.

(c)

In cases involving transfer for criminal prosecution, the pendency of an interlocutory appeal shall act to stay criminal proceedings. Until the time for filing an interlocutory appeal has lapsed, or if an appeal is filed until its completion, no child who has been ordered transferred for criminal prosecution shall be removed to a place of adult detention, except as provided in section 16-2313, or otherwise treated as an adult.

(d)

The decision of the District of Columbia Court of Appeals shall be final.

History

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 538, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 121(a)
Sept. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 2-22, title IV, § 408(a), 24 DCR 3341

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-2328.
1973 Ed., § 16-2328.